Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 3. Wildlife Violator Compact

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1997).

§ 23-6-301.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wildlife Violator Compact.”

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 24, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” means Laws 1996, ch. 24. The act's provisions are codified as article 3, §§

23-6-301

through

23-6-304

.

§ 23-6-302.
Execution of Compact.

The legislature hereby approves and the governor is authorized to enter into a compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 24, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Article I Findings, Declaration of Policy, and Purpose

The participating states find that:

Wildlife is managed by the respective states for the benefit of all residents and visitors;

The protection of the wildlife of a state is materially affected by the degree of compliance with state statutes, laws, regulations, ordinances and administrative rules relating to the management of those resources;

The preservation, protection, management and restoration of wildlife contributes immeasurably to the aesthetic, recreational and economic aspects of those natural resources;

Wildlife is valuable without regard to political boundaries; therefore, every person should be required to comply with wildlife preservation, protection, management and restoration laws and ordinances and administrative rules and regulations of the participating states as a condition precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license to hunt, fish, trap or possess wildlife as determined by local law;

Violation of wildlife laws interferes with the management of wildlife and may endanger the safety of persons and property;

The mobility of many wildlife law violators necessitates the maintenance of channels of communication among the various states;

In most instances, a person who is cited for a wildlife violation in a state other than his home state:

Is required to post collateral or a bond to secure appearance for a trial at a later date;

Is taken into custody until the collateral or bond is posted; or

Is taken directly to court for an immediate appearance.

The purpose of the enforcement practices set forth in paragraph (vii) of this article is to ensure compliance with the terms of a wildlife citation by the cited person who, if permitted to continue on his way after receiving the citation, could return to his home state and disregard his duty under the terms of the citation;

In most instances, a person receiving a wildlife citation in his home state is permitted to accept the citation from the officer at the scene of the violation and immediately continue on his way after agreeing or being instructed to comply with the terms of the citation;

The practices described in paragraph (vii) of this article cause unnecessary inconvenience and, at times, a hardship for the person who is unable at the time to post collateral, furnish a bond, stand trial, or pay a fine, and thus is compelled to remain in custody until some alternative arrangement is made; and

The enforcement practices described in paragraph (vii) of this article consume an undue amount of law enforcement time.

It is the policy of the participating states to:

Promote compliance with the statutes, laws, ordinances, regulations and administrative rules relating to management of wildlife in their respective states;

Recognize the suspension of wildlife license privileges of any person whose license privileges have been suspended by a participating state and treat the suspension as if it had occurred in their state;

Allow a violator, except as provided in subsection (b) of article III, to accept a wildlife citation and, without delay, proceed on his way, whether or not a resident of the state in which the citation was issued, provided that the violator's home state is party to this compact;

Report to the appropriate participating state, as provided in the compact manual, any conviction recorded against any person whose home state was not the issuing state;

Allow the home state to recognize and treat convictions recorded against its residents, which convictions occurred in a participating state, as though they had occurred in the home state;

Extend cooperation to its fullest extent among the participating states for enforcing compliance with the terms of a wildlife citation issued in one participating state to a resident of another participating state;

Maximize effective use of law enforcement personnel and information; and

Assist court systems in the efficient disposition of wildlife violations.

The purpose of this compact is to:

Provide a means through which participating states may join in a reciprocal program to effectuate the policies enumerated in subsection (b) of this article in a uniform and orderly manner; and

Provide for the fair and impartial treatment of wildlife violators operating within participating states in recognition of the violator's right to due process and the sovereign status of a participating state.

Article II Definitions

As used in this compact, unless the context required otherwise:

“Citation” means any summons, complaint, summons and complaint, ticket, penalty assessment or other official document issued to a person by a wildlife officer or other peace officer for a wildlife violation which contains an order requiring the person to respond;

“Collateral” means any cash or other security deposited to secure an appearance for trial in connection with the issuance by a wildlife officer or other peace officer of a citation for a wildlife violation;

“Compliance” with respect to a citation means the act of answering a citation through an appearance in a court or tribunal or through the payment of fines, costs and surcharges, if any;

“Conviction” means a conviction, including any court conviction, for any offense related to the preservation, protection, management or restoration of wildlife which is prohibited by state statute, law, regulation, ordinance or administrative rule, and such conviction shall also include the forfeiture of any bail, bond or other security deposited to secure appearance by a person charged with having committed any such offense, the payment of a penalty assessment, a plea of nolo contendere and the imposition of a deferred or suspended sentence by the court;

“Court” means a court of law, including magistrate's court;

“Home state” means the state of primary residence of a person;

“Issuing state” means the participating state which issues a wildlife citation to the violator;

“License” means any license, permit or other public document which conveys to the person to whom it was issued the privilege of pursuing, possessing or taking any wildlife regulated by statute, law, regulation, ordinance or administrative rule of a participating state;

“Licensing authority” means the department or division within each participating state which is authorized by law to issue or approve licenses or permits to hunt, fish, trap or possess wildlife;

“Participating state” means any state which enacts legislation to become a member of this wildlife compact;

“Personal recognizance” means an agreement by a person made at the time of issuance of the wildlife citation that the person will comply with the terms of the citation;

“State” means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Provinces of Canada and other countries;

“Suspension” means any revocation, denial or withdrawal of any or all license privileges, including the privilege to apply for, purchase or exercise the benefits conferred by any license;

“Terms of the citation” means those conditions and options expressly stated upon the citation;

“Wildlife” means all species of animals including, but not limited to, mammals, birds, fish, reptiles, amphibians, mollusks and crustaceans which are defined as “wildlife” and are protected or otherwise regulated by statute, law, regulation, ordinance or administrative rule in a participating state. Species included in the definition of “wildlife” vary from state to state and determination of whether a species is “wildlife” for the purposes of this compact shall be based on local law;

“Wildlife law” means any statute, law, regulation, ordinance or administrative rule developed and enacted for the management of wildlife resources and the uses thereof;

“Wildlife officer” means any individual authorized by a participating state to issue a citation for a wildlife violation;

“Wildlife violation” means any cited violation of a statute, law, regulation, ordinance or administrative rule developed and enacted for the management of wildlife resources and the uses thereof.

Article III Procedures for Issuing State

When issuing a citation for a wildlife violation, a wildlife officer shall issue a citation to any person whose primary residence is in a participating state in the same manner as though the person were a resident of the issuing state and shall not require the person to post collateral to secure appearance, subject to the exceptions noted in subsection (b) of this article, if the officer receives the recognizance of the person that he will comply with the terms of the citation.

Personal recognizance is acceptable:

If not prohibited by local law or the compact manual; and

If the violator provides adequate proof of identification to the wildlife officer.

Upon conviction or failure of a person to comply with the terms of a wildlife citation, the appropriate official shall report the conviction or failure to comply to the licensing authority of the participating state in which the wildlife citation was issued. The report shall be made in accordance with procedures specified by the issuing state and shall contain information as specified in the compact manual as minimum requirements for effective processing by the home state.

Upon receipt of the report of conviction or noncompliance pursuant to subsection (c) of this article, the licensing authority of the issuing state shall transmit to the licensing authority of the home state of the violator the information in form and content as prescribed in the compact manual.

Article IV Procedure for Home State

Upon receipt of a report from the licensing authority of the issuing state reporting the failure of a violator to comply with the terms of a citation, the licensing authority of the home state shall notify the violator and shall initiate a suspension action in accordance with the home state's suspension procedures and shall suspend the violator's license privileges until satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation has been furnished by the issuing state to the home state licensing authority. Due process safeguards shall be accorded.

Upon receipt of a report of conviction from the licensing authority of the issuing state, the licensing authority of the home state shall enter the conviction in its records and shall treat the conviction as though it occurred in the home state for the purposes of the suspension of license privileges.

The licensing authority of the home state shall maintain a record of actions taken and shall make reports to issuing states as provided in the compact manual.

Article V Reciprocal Recognition of Suspension

All participating states shall recognize the suspension of license privileges of any person by any participating state as though the violation resulting in the suspension had occurred in their state and could have been the basis for suspension of license privileges in their state.

Each participating state shall communicate suspension information to other participating states in form and content as contained in the compact manual.

Article VI Applicability of Other Laws

Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing herein shall be construed to affect the right of any participating state to apply any of its laws relating to license privileges to any person or circumstance or to invalidate or prevent any agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a participating state and a nonparticipating state concerning wildlife law enforcement.

Article VII Compact Administrator Procedures

For the purpose of administering the provisions of this compact and to serve as a governing body for the resolution of all matters relating to the operation of this compact, a board of compact administrators is established. The board shall be composed of one (1) representative from each of the participating states to be known as the compact administrator. The compact administrator shall be appointed by the head of the licensing authority of each participating state and shall serve and be subject to removal in accordance with the laws of the state he represents. A compact administrator may provide for the discharge of his duties and the performance of his functions as a board member by an alternate. An alternate shall not be entitled to serve unless written notification of his identity has been given to the board.

Each member of the board of compact administrators shall be entitled to one (1) vote. No action of the board shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of the board's votes are cast in favor thereof. Action by the board shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the participating states are represented.

The board shall elect annually from its membership a chairman and vice chairman.

The board shall adopt bylaws not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact or the laws of a participating state for the conduct of its business and shall have the power to amend and rescind its bylaws.

The board may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all donations and grants of monies, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any governmental agency, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same.

The board may contract with, or accept services or personnel from, any governmental or intergovernmental agency, individual, firm, or corporation, or any private nonprofit organization or institution.

The board shall formulate all necessary procedures and develop uniform forms and documents for administering the provisions of this compact. All procedures and forms adopted pursuant to board action shall be contained in a compact manual.

Article VIII Entry into Compact and Withdrawal

This compact shall become effective at such time as it is adopted in a substantially similar form by two (2) or more states.

Entry into the compact shall be made by resolution of ratification executed by the authorized officials of the applying state and submitted to the chairman of the board. The resolution shall substantially be in the form and content as provided in the compact manual and shall include the following:

A citation of the authority from which the state is empowered to become a party to this compact;

An agreement of compliance with the terms and provisions of this compact; and

An agreement that compact entry is with all states participating in the compact and with all additional states legally becoming a party to the compact.

The effective date of entry shall be specified by the applying state but shall not be less than sixty (60) days after notice has been given:

By the chairman of the board of the compact administrators; or

By the secretariat of the board to each participating state that the resolution from the applying state has been received.

A participating state may withdraw from participation in this compact by official written notice to each participating state, but withdrawal shall not become effective until ninety (90) days after the notice of withdrawal is given. The notice shall be directed to the compact administrator of each member state. No withdrawal of any state shall affect the validity of this compact as to the remaining participating states.

Article IX Amendments to the Compact

This compact may be amended from time to time. Amendments shall be presented in resolution form to the chairman of the board of compact administrators and shall be initiated by one (1) or more participating states.

Adoption of an amendment shall require endorsement by all participating states and shall become effective thirty (30) days after the date of the last endorsement.

A participating state shall respond to the compact chairman within one hundred twenty (120) days after receipt of a proposed amendment. Amendments proposed to change local law by the compact administrators shall be reviewed and approved by the legislature.

The 2004 amendment,

in Article II(a)(v), deleted “and the justice of the peace court” at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in Article II of this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 23-6-303.
Licensing authority; definition.

As used in the compact, the term “licensing authority,” with reference to this state, means the Wyoming game and fish department. The director of the department shall furnish to the appropriate authorities of the participating states any information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of the compact.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 24, § 1.

§ 23-6-304.
Compact administrator; expenses.

The compact administrator provided for in article VII of the “Wildlife Violator Compact” shall not be entitled to any additional compensation for his service as the administrator but shall be entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as the administrator in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 24, § 1.